Washington statutes.
RCW 1.04.015

Numbering new sections, chapters—Corrections.

New chapters or sections added to the Revised Code of Washington (as supplemented or modified by the 1950 supplement), as the result of laws enacted at this or subsequent sessions of the legislature, shall be numbered in harmony with said general numbering system, and shall bear such respective numbers in accordance therewith as may be assigned by such official or agency as may be expressly authorized by law so to do.

This section shall not prohibit or prevent the correction by any such official or agency, of the number of any section of the revised code found clearly to be incorrectly numbered or incorrectly correlated with other sections as to number.

[ 1951 c 5 s 4.]